Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.200

Use of records—Exchange of information—Chapter does not affect or limit.

This chapter does not affect the use of records, obtained from the director or the disciplinary authorities, in any existing investigation or action by any public agency. Nor does this chapter limit any existing exchange of information between the director or the disciplinary authorities and other public agencies.

[ 2002 c 86 s 121.]